Maryland, session 2026, SB0259.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
20–306.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Closed captioning” means a transcript or dialog of the audio portion of
a television program that is displayed on a television receiver screen when the user
activates the feature.
(3) “Closed movie captioning” means the written display of the dialog and
certain nonspeech information of a motion picture that is generally delivered to individual
patrons on a captioning device in a motion picture house.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0259*

SENATE BILL 259
(4) “Closed–captioning television receiver” means a receiver of television
programming that has the ability to display closed captioning, including a television, digital
set top box, and any other technology capable of displaying closed captioning.
(5) “Open movie captioning” means a transcript or dialog of the audio
portion of a motion picture that is displayed on a motion picture screen that cannot be
turned off by a viewer.
(6) “Public area” means a part of a place of public accommodation that is
open to the general public.
(7) “Regular hours” means the hours of any day in which a place of public
accommodation is open to members of the general public.
(b) (1) On request, a place of public accommodation may not fail to keep closed
captioning activated on any closed–captioning television receiver that is in use during
regular hours in any public area.
(2) This subsection does not require a place of public accommodation to
make closed captioning available in a public area of the place of public accommodation if:
(i) no television receiver of any kind is available in the public area;
or
(ii) the only public television receiver available in the public area is
not a closed–captioning television receiver.
(c) (1) A place of public accommodation that is a motion picture house shall
provide access to fully operational and well–maintained closed movie captioning technology
for the general public for each screening of a motion picture that is produced and available
with closed movie captioning as required by Title III of the federal Americans with
Disabilities Act.
(2) (i) This paragraph does not apply to motion pictures screened fewer
than five times from Friday through Thursday in a 7–day period in the motion picture
house.
(ii) This paragraph applies only to the first 3 weeks after a motion
picture premieres in the motion picture house.
(iii) If a motion picture is produced and available to motion picture
houses with open movie captioning, a place of public accommodation that controls, operates,
owns, or leases a motion picture house with [eight] FOUR or more screens in the State shall
provide open movie captioning for at least two screenings for each motion picture it screens
each week.

SENATE BILL 259 3
(iv) Beginning 3 weeks after a motion picture premieres, a place of
accommodation that controls, operates, owns, or leases a motion picture house with [eight]
FOUR or more screens in the State may provide open movie captioning with reasonable
notice.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.